North Carolina statutes. Chapter 83A. Architects and Registered Interior Designers.
§ 83A-15.
Denial, suspension or revocation of license.

The Board shall have the power to suspend or revoke a license or certificate of registration of an architect or a registration of an interior designer, to deny a license or certificate of registration of an architect or a registration of an interior designer, or to reprimand or levy a civil penalty not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00) per violation against any registrant who is found guilty of:

Dishonest conduct, including but not limited to:

The commission of any fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in any professional relationship with clients or other persons; or with reference to obtaining or maintaining license, or with reference to qualifications, experience and past or present service.

Using or permitting an individual professional seal to be used by or for others, or otherwise representing registrant as the author of drawings or specifications other than those prepared personally by or under direct supervision of registrant.

Using a professional license or registration from the Board that had been suspended or revoked.

Conduct of the registrant resulting in the imposition of other disciplinary action by a regulatory body of another state for any cause other than failure to pay applicable fees.

Surrendered or did not renew a professional license or registration after the initiation of any investigation or proceeding by such body.

Incompetence, including but not limited to:

Gross negligence, recklessness, or excessive errors or omissions or building failures in registrant’s record of professional practice; or

Mental or physical disability or addiction to alcohol or drugs so as to endanger health, safety and interest of the public by impairing skill and care in professional services.

The registrant has been adjudged mentally incapable by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Unprofessional conduct, including but not limited to:

Practicing or offering to practice architecture or interior design without a current license or registration from this Board.

Knowingly aiding or abetting others to evade or violate the provisions of this Chapter, or the health and safety laws of this or other states;

Knowingly undertaking any activity or having any significant financial or other interest, or accepting any compensation or reward except from registrant’s clients, any of which would reasonably appear to compromise registrant’s professional judgment in serving the best interest of clients or public.

Willfully violating this Chapter or any rule or standard of conduct published by the Board, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or any crime involving moral turpitude.

Falsely impersonating a practitioner or former practitioner of a like or different name or practicing under an assumed or fictitious name.

Grossly unprofessional conduct.

Actions to recover civil penalties against any registrant may be commenced by the Board pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Board shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of any civil penalty collected hereunder shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1915, c. 270, s. 5; 1919, c. 336, s. 3; C.S., s. 4993; 1953, c. 1041, s. 1; 1957, c. 794, s. 8; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; 1979, c. 871, s. 1; 1989, c. 81; 1998-215, s. 128; 2021-81, s. 1.

§ 83A-16.
Violations of Chapter; penalties.

Any individual or firm not registered under this Chapter, who shall wrongfully use the title “Architect” or represent himself or herself to the public as an architect, practice architecture as herein defined, present as his or her own the license of another, give false or forged evidence to the Board or any member thereof in obtaining a license, falsely impersonate any other practitioner of like or different name, use or attempt to use a license that has been revoked, or seek to avoid the provisions of this Chapter by the use of any other designation than “Architect”: (i) shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor; and (ii) be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day of such violation. Each day of such unlawful practice shall constitute a distinct and separate violation. The clear proceeds of any civil penalty collected hereunder shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

(a1)

Any individual or firm not registered under this Chapter, who shall wrongfully use the title “registered interior designer,” represent himself or herself to the public as a “registered interior designer,” seek to avoid the provisions of this Chapter by the use of any other designation than “registered interior designer,” present as his or her own the registration of another, give false or forged evidence to the Board or any member thereof in obtaining a registration, falsely impersonate any other practitioner of like or different name, use or attempt to use a registration that has been revoked, or otherwise violate any of the provisions in this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day of such violation. Each day of such unlawful practice shall constitute a distinct and separate violation. The clear proceeds of any civil penalty collected hereunder shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

(a2)

Before imposing and assessing a civil penalty, the Board shall consider the following factors:

The nature, gravity, and persistence of the particular violation.

The appropriateness of the imposition of a civil penalty when considered alone or in combination with other punishment.

Whether the violation was willful and malicious.

Any other factors that would tend to mitigate or aggravate the violations found to exist.

Actions and prosecutions under this section shall be commenced in the county in which the defendant resides, or has his principal place of business, or in the case of an out-of-state corporation, is conducting business.

Actions to recover civil penalties shall be initiated by the Attorney General, or any private counsel retained under

G.S. 114-2.3

.

The Board shall establish a schedule of civil penalties for violations of this Chapter and rules adopted by the Board.

The Board may in a disciplinary proceeding charge costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to the licensee or registered interior designer against whom the proceedings were brought.

History.

1915, c. 270, s. 4; C.S., s. 4996; 1941, c. 369, ss. 1, 2; 1951, c. 1130, s. 3; 1957, c. 794, s. 11; 1965, c. 1100; 1969, c. 718, s. 21; 1973, c. 1414, s. 1; 1979, c. 871, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 595; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 129; 2021-81, s. 1.

§ 83A-17.
Power of Board to seek injunction.

The Board may appear in its own name and apply to courts having jurisdiction for injunctions to prevent violations of this Chapter or of rules issued pursuant thereto, and such courts are empowered to grant such injunctions regardless of whether criminal prosecution or other action has been or may be instituted as a result of such violation. A single act of unauthorized or illegal practice shall be sufficient, if shown, to invoke the injunctive relief of this section or criminal penalties under

G.S. 83A-16

.

History.

1979, c. 871, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).